District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

11-2303

Former duties of coroner; oaths; teaching.

Repealed.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 518, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
June 13, 1994, Pub. L. 103-266, § 1(b)(103), 108 Stat. 713
Nov. 22, 2000, 114 Stat. 2440, Pub. L. 106-522, § 148(a)
1981 Ed., § 11-2303.
1973 Ed., § 11-2303.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to the District of Columbia Council and to a Commissioner of the District of Columbia. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made, in brackets, in this section.